Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 2 O.S. 2021, Section 7-414, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 7-414. A. The provisions of the Oklahoma Milk and Milk


Products Act shall not be construed to:


1. Include incidental sales of ungraded raw milk and raw milk


products directly to consumers:


a. at the farm where the ungraded raw milk or raw milk


product is produced, or

Req. No. 2246 Page 1


b. by transport by the farmer or producer of ungraded raw


milk or raw milk products pursuant to subsection B of


Section 2 of this act;


2. Preclude the advertising of the incidental sale of goat


milk; and


3. Preclude the advertising of the sale of ungraded raw milk


and raw milk products; and


4. Prohibit any farmer or producer from making cheese using


milk or cream produced on the farm of such farmer or producer.


B. For purposes of this section, incidental sales of goat milk


or milk products are those sales where the average monthly number of


gallons sold does not exceed one hundred (100) one thousand five


hundred (1,500).


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7-422 of Title 2, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any farmer or producer selling, offering, or exposing for


sale ungraded raw milk or raw milk products from his or her


livestock shall be exempt from the provisions of the Oklahoma Milk


and Milk Products Act.


B. 1. Ungraded raw milk or raw milk products sold pursuant to


this section shall be produced by the livestock maintained on the


premises from which the ungraded raw milk or raw milk products are


advertised for sale.

Req. No. 2246 Page 2


2. Ungraded raw milk or raw milk products may be transported


off the premises from which the ungraded raw milk or raw milk


products are produced for sale at a farmers market or by a third-


party vendor to a consumer.


C. Any farmer or producer selling, offering, or exposing for


sale raw milk or raw milk products pursuant to subsection B of this


section shall label the container to indicate to the consumer that


the product is raw or unpasteurized milk and the date the milk was


filled, and disclose if the product is not licensed, regulated, or


inspected prior to delivery.


SECTION 3. REPEALER 2 O.S. 2021, Section 7-417, is


hereby repealed.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2246 YG 1/15/2026 1:10:13 PM













Req. No. 2246 Page 3